Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-830
Office of Homeland Security; created;
Director of State Homeland Security; Homeland Security Policy Group; created;
members; duties.

(1) The Office of Homeland Security is created.
The Governor shall appoint the Director of State Homeland Security who shall
serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

(2) The purpose of the office is to ensure preparedness by the State
of Nebraska in response to terrorist acts. The office shall coordinate efforts
regarding domestic security issues with the United States Department of Homeland
Security. The Director of State Homeland Security shall serve as the contact
between the state and the United States Department of Homeland Security.

(3)(a) The Homeland Security Policy Group is created. The Director of
State Homeland Security shall serve as chairperson of the policy group. The
policy group is charged with assessing strategic alternatives and recommending
broad courses of action for the development of comprehensive strategies. The
Governor shall appoint other members of the policy group who shall serve at
the will of the Governor. The Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall
select one member of the Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee
and one member of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature to serve
as ex officio nonvoting members of the policy group.

(b) The policy group shall report electronically by
March 1 of each year to the executive board identifying federal funds sent
to the state in support of its preparedness activities and indicating the
use of federal funds received by the state for homeland security, including
specific amounts allocated to any unit of state or local government and the
use to which the unit shall apply the funds.

(c) The policy group shall not be subject to the Open Meetings Act or
to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 2006, LB 940, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 173.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.